src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kelu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - келу: # Ordinary nouns 'woman' - full paradigm including MWN
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: келу
     келу+N+SP+Gen+Indef: келунь
     келу+N+SP+Abl+Indef: келуда
     келу+N+SP+Dat+Indef: келунди
     келу+N+SP+Abe+Indef: келуфтома
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: келушка
     келу+N+SP+Ine+Indef: келуса
     келу+N+SP+Ela+Indef: келуста
     келу+N+SP+Ill+Indef: келус
     келу+N+SP+Prl+Indef: келува
     келу+N+SP+Tra+Indef: келукс
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: келузе
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: келуне
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: келузень
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: келунень
     келу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [келузенди, келузти]
     келу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: келуненди
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: келудон
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: келуфтомон
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: келушкан
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: келусон
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: келустон
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: келузон
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: келуван
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: келуце
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: келуфне
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: келуцень
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: келуфнень
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: келудот
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: келуфтомот
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: келушкат
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: келусот
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: келустот
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: келузт
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: келуват
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: келуц
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: келунза
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: келунц
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: келунзон
     келу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: келунцты
     келу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: келунзонды
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: келудонза
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: келуфтомонза
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: келушканза
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: келусонза
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: келустонза
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: келузонза
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: келуванза
     келу+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: келуньке
     келу+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: келуньконь
     келу+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: келуньконди
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: келудонк
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: келуфтомонк
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: келушканк
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: келусонк
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: келустонк
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: келузонк
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: келуванк
     келу+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: келунте
     келу+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: келунтень
     келу+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: келунтенди
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: келудонт
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: келуфтомонт
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: келушкант
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: келусонт
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: келустонт
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: келузонт
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: келувант
     келу+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: келусна
     келу+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: келуснон
     келу+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: келуснонды
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: келудост
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: келуфтомост
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: келушкаст
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: келусост
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: келустост
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: келузост
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: келуваст
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: келуфт
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+Def: келусь
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+Def: келуть
     келу+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [келути, келунди]
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+Def: келуфне
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+Def: келуфнень
     келу+N+Pl+Dat+Def: келуфненди    
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: келувок
     #келу+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: келуньвок
     келу+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: келуньге 
     #синь+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Clt/Add: синьге 
     келу+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: келудовок
     келу+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: [келутивок, келундивок]
     келу+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: келуфтомовок
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: келушкавок
     келу+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: келусовок
     келу+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: келустовок
     келу+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: келуска
     келу+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: келувавок
     келу+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: келукска
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келузевок
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келуневок
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келузеньге
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келуненьге
     келу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [келузтивок, келузендивок]
     келу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келунендивок
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келудонга
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келуфтомонга
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келушканка
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келусонга
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келустонга
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келузонга
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: келуванга
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келуцевок
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келуфневок
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келуценьвок
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келуфненьге
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келудотка
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келуфтомотка
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келушкатка
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келусотка
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келустотка
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келузотка
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: келуватка
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келуцевок
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келунзовок
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келунцка
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келунзонга
     келу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келунцтывок
     келу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келунзондывок
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келудонзовок
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келуфтомонзовок
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келушканзовок
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келусонзовок
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келустонзовок
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келузонзовок
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: келуванзовок
     келу+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келунькевок
     келу+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келуньконьге
     келу+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келунькондивок
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келудонковок
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келуфтомонковок
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келушканковок
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келусонковок
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келустонковок
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келузонковок
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: келуванковок
     келу+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келунтевок
     келу+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келунтеньге
     келу+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келунтендивок
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келудонтка
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келуфтомонтка
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келушкантка
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келусонтка
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келустонтка
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келузонтка
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: келувантка
     келу+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келусновок
     келу+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келуснонга
     келу+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келуснондывок
     келу+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келудостка
     келу+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келуфтомостка
     келу+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келушкастка
     келу+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келусостка
     келу+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келустостка
     келу+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келузостка
     келу+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: келувастка
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: келуфтка
     келу+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: келуське
     келу+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: келутьке
     келу+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [келутивок, келуньдивок]
     келу+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: келуфневок
     келу+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: келуфненьге
     келу+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: келуфнендивок
